test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-gillar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - gillar: # N_ODD_WG
    gillar+N+Sg+Nom: gillar
    gillar+N+Sg+Gen: gillara
    gillar+N+Sg+Acc: gillarav
    gillar+N+Sg+Ill: gillarij
    gillar+N+Sg+Ine: gillarin
    gillar+N+Sg+Ela: [gillarist, gillaris]
    gillar+N+Sg+Com: gillarijn
    gillar+N+Pl+Nom: gillara
    gillar+N+Pl+Gen: gillarij
    gillar+N+Pl+Acc: gillarijt
    gillar+N+Pl+Ill: gillarijda
    gillar+N+Pl+Ine: gillarijn
    gillar+N+Pl+Ela: [gillarijst, gillarijs]
    gillar+N+Pl+Com: [gillarij, gillarijgum]
    gillar+N+Ess: gillarin
    gillar+N+Abe: gillarahtá
